Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.100

Use of Puget Sound marine shoreline surveys in investigations and enforcement actions—Record.

The department shall maintain a record of all civil or criminal investigations or enforcement actions in which the department is a participant that utilize georeferenced imagery or surveys produced pursuant to RCW 43.21A.530.

[ 2023 c 465 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 465: See note following RCW 43.21A.530.